Hawaii statutes.
[§196-68] Compliance with revenue bond law. For
purposes of assuring conformity of and compliance with
part III of chapter 39, it is determined as follows:

(1) For purposes of section 39-51, "revenues" shall include the green
infrastructure fee and the proceeds of green infrastructure property; "loan program" shall include the loan
program authorized under section 196-62; and "undertaking"
shall include financing of the loan program through the issuance of green
infrastructure revenue bonds;

(2) In addition and supplemental to
any covenants recognized under section 39-60, any
resolution, certificate, or indenture approved by the
department may have additional or alternative covenants as may be consistent
with this chapter, and the department may enter into a trust indenture,
servicing agreement, or other financing documents
having terms and conditions consistent with the financing order issued under
section 269-163;

(3) In addition and supplemental to
the power to impose rates, rentals, fees, or
charges required under section 39-61, the department shall impose, adjust, and
collect the green infrastructure fee as provided in section
269-166 and the financing order issued pursuant
thereto; and

(4) In addition and supplemental to
the uses specified in section 39-62, the green
infrastructure fee shall be applied as provided in this chapter, the financing order, the certificate issued by the department, and any financing documents executed by the department in
connection with the bonds. [L
2013, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next